Utah statutes.
10-7-66.   Fines and forfeitures to be paid to treasurer -- Exceptions.

Except where otherwise provided by law in relation to fines, fees, and forfeitures imposed or received by district courts, all fines and forfeitures for the violation of ordinances shall be paid into the treasury of the corporation at such times and in such manner as may be prescribed by ordinance.



Amended by Chapter 198, 1996 General Session

